test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-atoskah_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - atoskah - help : # Ordinary TA verb - full paradigm
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: nitatoskahâw
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kitatoskahâw
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: atoskahêw
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: atoskahêyiwa

     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: nitatoskahânân
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kitatoskahânaw
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kitatoskahâwâw
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3SgO: atoskahêwak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Pl+3SgO: atoskahêyiwa

     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: nitatoskahâwak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kitatoskahâwak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3PlO: atoskahêw
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+3PlO: atoskahêyiwa
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+4PlO: atoskahikoyiwa

     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: nitatoskahânânak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kitatoskahânawak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kitatoskahâwâwak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: atoskahikowak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: atoskahêwak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Pl+3PlO: atoskahêyiwa

     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: nitatoskahik
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kitatoskahik
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: nitatoskahikonân
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kitatoskahikonaw
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kitatoskahikowâw
     
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: nitatoskahikwak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kitatoskahikwak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: nitatoskahikonânak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kitatoskahikonawak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kitatoskahikowâwak
     
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [ê-atoskahak, êhatoskahak]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [ê-atoskahakik, êhatoskahakik]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [ê-atoskahâyâhk, êhatoskahâyâhk]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [ê-atoskahâyâhkik, êhatoskahâyâhkik]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [ê-atoskahâyahk, êhatoskahâyahk]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [ê-atoskahâyâhkok, êhatoskahâyâhkok]
     
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [ê-atoskahat, êhatoskahat]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [ê-atoskahacik, êhatoskahacik]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [ê-atoskahâyêk, êhatoskahâyêk]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [ê-atoskahâyêkok, êhatoskahâyêkok]

     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4PlO: [ê-atoskahikocik, êhatoskahikocik]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+3SgO: [ê-atoskahâcik, êhatoskahâcik]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: [ê-atoskahâcik, êhatoskahâcik]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [ê-atoskahiskik, êhatoskahiskik]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyêkok, êhatoskahikoyêkok]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [ê-atoskahicik, êhatoskahicik]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyâhkik, êhatoskahikoyâhkik]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyâhkok, êhatoskahikoyâhkok]

     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4PlO: [ê-atoskahikocik, êhatoskahikocik]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: [ê-atoskahât, êhatoskahât]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+3PlO: [ê-atoskahât, êhatoskahât]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [ê-atoskahisk, êhatoskahisk]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyêk, êhatoskahikoyêk]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [ê-atoskahit, êhatoskahit]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyâhk, êhatoskahikoyâhk]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyahk, êhatoskahikoyahk]

     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+4SgO: [ê-atoskahkoyit, êhatoskahkoyit]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+4PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyit, êhatoskahikoyit]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: [ê-atoskahâyit, êhatoskahâyit]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3PlO: [ê-atoskahikocik, êhatoskahikocik]

     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Pl+4SgO: [ê-atoskahkoyit, êhatoskahkoyit]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Pl+4PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyit, êhatoskahikoyit]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Pl+3SgO: [ê-atoskahkot, êhatoskahkot]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Pl+3SgO: [ê-atoskahikot, êhatoskahikot]
     atoskah+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Pl+3PlO: [ê-atoskahikocik, êhatoskahikocik]


     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO: atoskahaki
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO: atoskahakwâwi
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO: atoskahâyâhki
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyâhkwâwi
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO: atoskahâyâhko
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyâhkwâwi

     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO: atoskahaci
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO: atoskahatwâwi
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO: atoskahâyêko
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyêkwâwi

     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+3SgO: atoskahâci
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4SgO: atoskahâyici
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+3PlO: atoskahikotwâwi
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1SgO: atoskahici
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2SgO: atoskahiski
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO: atoskahikoyâhki
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO: atoskahikoyêko
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO: atoskahikoyahko

     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+3SgO: atoskahâtwâwi
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+3PlO: atoskahâtwâwi
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+3PlO: atoskahikotwâwi


     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg+3SgO: atoskahikoci
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg+3PlO: atoskahâyici
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Pl+3SgO: atoskahikoci
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyici
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg+4PlO: atoskahikoyici
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Pl+4PlO: atoskahikoyici
